Yamls/Pron-setshom_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Pronoun – cэтшӧм: # Demonstrative Pronoun 'Sellainen / Такой'
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom: cэтшӧм
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom: cэтшӧмӧсь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc: [cэтшӧмӧ, cэтшӧмӧс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen: cэтшӧмлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Abl: cэтшӧмлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Dat: cэтшӧмлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ins: cэтшӧмӧн 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Com: cэтшӧмкӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Car: cэтшӧмтӧг
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cns: cэтшӧмла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cmpr: cэтшӧмся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ine: cэтшӧмын
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ela: cэтшӧмись
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill: cэтшӧмӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Apr: cэтшӧмлань
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Egr: cэтшӧмсянь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Prl: cэтшӧмӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerI: cэтшӧмӧдз
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerII: cэтшӧмви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIne: cэтшӧмланьын
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEla: cэтшӧмланись
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIll: cэтшӧмланьӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEgr: cэтшӧмланьсянь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprPrl: cэтшӧмланьӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerI: cэтшӧмланьӧдз
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerII: cэтшӧмланьви


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: cэтшӧмнам 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Com+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧкӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Car+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмӧтӧг, cэтшӧмтӧгьям] 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: cэтшӧмам
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: cэтшӧмсим
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: cэтшӧмам
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмӧлань, cэтшӧмланям]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмӧсянь, cэтшӧмсяням]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмӧттям, cэтшӧмӧттим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмӧдззам, cэтшӧмӧдззим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмланям, cэтшӧмӧланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмланьсим, cэтшӧмӧланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмланям, cэтшӧмӧланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмӧланьсянь, cэтшӧмланьсяням] 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмӧланьӧт, cэтшӧмланьӧттям, cэтшӧмланьӧттим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [cэтшӧмӧланьӧдз, cэтшӧмланьӧдззам, cэтшӧмланьӧдззим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: cэтшӧмӧланьви


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: cэтшӧмыт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: cэтшӧмтӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: cэтшӧмытлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: cэтшӧмытлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: cэтшӧмытлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: cэтшӧмнат 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Com+PxSg2: cэтшӧмыткӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмыттӧг, cэтшӧмтӧгьят]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: cэтшӧмытла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: cэтшӧмытся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: cэтшӧмат
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: cэтшӧмсит
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: cэтшӧмат
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмытлань, cэтшӧмланят]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмытсянь, cэтшӧмсянят]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмӧттят, cэтшӧмӧттит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмӧдззат, cэтшӧмӧдззит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: cэтшӧмытви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмланят, cэтшӧмытланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмланьсит, cэтшӧмытланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмланят, cэтшӧмытланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмытланьсянь, cэтшӧмланьсянят] 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмытланьӧт, cэтшӧмланьӧттят, cэтшӧмланьӧттит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмытланьӧдз, cэтшӧмланьӧдззат, cэтшӧмланьӧдззит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: cэтшӧмытланьви


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: cэтшӧмыс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: cэтшӧмсӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: cэтшӧмыслӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: cэтшӧмыслісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: cэтшӧмыслӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: cэтшӧмнас 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Com+PxSg3: cэтшӧмыскӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Car+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмыстӧг, cэтшӧмтӧгьяс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: cэтшӧмысла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: cэтшӧмысся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: cэтшӧмас
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: cэтшӧмсис
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: cэтшӧмас
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмыслань, cэтшӧмланяс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмыссянь, cэтшӧмсяняс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмӧттяс, cэтшӧмӧттис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмӧдззас, cэтшӧмӧдззис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: cэтшӧмысви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмланяс, cэтшӧмысланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмланьсис, cэтшӧмысланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмланяс, cэтшӧмысланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмысланьсянь, cэтшӧмланьсяняс] 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмысланьӧт, cэтшӧмланьӧттяс, cэтшӧмланьӧттис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмысланьӧдз, cэтшӧмланьӧдззас, cэтшӧмланьӧдззис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: cэтшӧмысланьви


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: cэтшӧмным
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымӧс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнаным 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Com+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымкӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмнымтӧг, cэтшӧмтӧгьяным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: cэтшӧманым
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: cэтшӧмсиным
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: cэтшӧманым
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмнымлань, cэтшӧмланяным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмнымсянь, cэтшӧмсяняным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмӧттяным, cэтшӧмӧттиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмӧдззаным, cэтшӧмӧдззиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмланяным, cэтшӧмнымланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмланьсиным, cэтшӧмнымланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмланяным, cэтшӧмнымланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмнымланьсянь, cэтшӧмланьсяняным] 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмнымланьӧт, cэтшӧмланьӧттяным, cэтшӧмланьӧттиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [cэтшӧмнымланьӧдз, cэтшӧмланьӧдззаным, cэтшӧмланьӧдззиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: cэтшӧмнымланьви


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: cэтшӧмныт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнытӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнытлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнытлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнытлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнаныт 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Com+PxPl2: cэтшӧмныткӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Car+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмныттӧг, cэтшӧмтӧгьяныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнытла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнытся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: cэтшӧманыт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: cэтшӧмсиныт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: cэтшӧманыт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмнытлань, cэтшӧмланяныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмнытсянь, cэтшӧмсяняныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмӧттяныт, cэтшӧмӧттиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмӧдззаныт, cэтшӧмӧдззиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнытви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмланяныт, cэтшӧмнытланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмланьсиныт, cэтшӧмнытланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмланяныт, cэтшӧмнытланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмнытланьсянь, cэтшӧмланьсяняныт] 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмнытланьӧт, cэтшӧмланьӧттяныт, cэтшӧмланьӧттиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [cэтшӧмнытланьӧдз, cэтшӧмланьӧдззаныт, cэтшӧмланьӧдззиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: cэтшӧмнытланьви


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: cэтшӧмныс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: cэтшӧмнысӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: cэтшӧмныслӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: cэтшӧмныслісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: cэтшӧмныслӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: cэтшӧмнаныс 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Com+PxPl3: cэтшӧмныскӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Car+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмныстӧг, cэтшӧмтӧгьяныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: cэтшӧмнысла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: cэтшӧмнысся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: cэтшӧманыс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: cэтшӧмсиныс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: cэтшӧманыс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмныслань, cэтшӧмланяныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмныссянь, cэтшӧмсяняныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмӧттяныс, cэтшӧмӧттиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмӧдззаныс, cэтшӧмӧдззиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: cэтшӧмнысви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмланяныс, cэтшӧмнысланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмланьсиныс, cэтшӧмнысланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмланяныс, cэтшӧмнысланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмнысланьсянь, cэтшӧмланьсяняныс] 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмнысланьӧт, cэтшӧмланьӧттяныс, cэтшӧмланьӧттиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [cэтшӧмнысланьӧдз, cэтшӧмланьӧдззаныс, cэтшӧмланьӧдззиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: cэтшӧмнысланьви


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom: cэтшӧммез
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc: [cэтшӧммезӧ, cэтшӧммезӧс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen: cэтшӧммезлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl: cэтшӧммезлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat: cэтшӧммезлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins: cэтшӧммезӧн 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com: cэтшӧммезкӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car: cэтшӧммезтӧг
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns: cэтшӧммезла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr: cэтшӧммезся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine: cэтшӧммезын
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela: cэтшӧммезісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill: cэтшӧммезӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr: cэтшӧммезлань
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr: cэтшӧммезсянь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl: cэтшӧммезӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI: cэтшӧммезӧдз
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII: cэтшӧммезви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne: cэтшӧммезланьын
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla: cэтшӧммезланись
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll: cэтшӧммезланьӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr: cэтшӧммезланьсянь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl: cэтшӧммезланьӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI: cэтшӧммезланьӧдз
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII: cэтшӧммезланьви
